Illinois, session 104th, SB3807.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Behavior Analyst Licensing Act is amended 5by changing Sections 20, 60, and 70 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 6/20)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 20. License required; exemptions. 9    (a) Beginning 10 months after the adoption of the rules 10required under subsection (b) of Section 80, an individual 11shall not engage in the practice of applied behavior analysis 12unless licensed under this Act or covered by an exemption 13under subsection (c).14    (a-5) An individual licensed under this Act as an 15assistant behavior analyst shall not engage in the practice of 16applied behavior analysis unless supervised by a licensed 17clinical psychologist or licensed behavior analyst. 18    (b) Beginning 10 months after the adoption of the rules 19required under subsection (b) of Section 80, an individual 20shall not use the title "licensed behavior analyst", "L.B.A.", 21"licensed assistant behavior analyst", "L.A.B.A.", or similar 22words or letters indicating the individual is licensed as a 23behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst unless the   SB3807- 2 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1individual is actually licensed under this Act.2    (c) This Act does not prohibit any of the following:3        (1) Self-care by a patient or uncompensated care by a 4    friend or family member who does not represent or hold 5    oneself out to be a behavior analyst or assistant behavior 6    analyst.7        (2) An individual from implementing a behavior 8    analytic treatment plan under the extended authority, 9    direction, and supervision of a licensed behavior analyst 10    or licensed assistant behavior analyst.11        (3) A clinical psychologist, social worker, 12    psychiatric nurse, speech-language pathologist, 13    audiologist, professional counselor, clinical 14    professional counselor, clinical social worker, 15    occupational therapist, or marriage and family therapist 16    from performing or advertising activities that are 17    considered to be the practice of applied behavior analysis 18    under this Act if the activities are consistent with the 19    laws of this State, the individual's training, and any 20    code of ethics of the individual's respective professions, 21    so long as the individual does not use the titles provided 22    in subsection (b).23        (4) An individual from performing activities that are 24    considered to be the practice of applied behavior analysis 25    under this Act if the activities are with nonhumans, 26    including applied animal behaviorists and animal trainers.   SB3807- 3 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    The individual may use the title "behavior analyst" but 2    shall not represent oneself as a licensed behavior analyst 3    or licensed assistant behavior analyst unless the 4    individual holds a license issued by the State.5        (5) An individual who provides general applied 6    behavior analysis services to organizations, so long as 7    the services are for the benefit of the organizations and 8    do not involve direct services to individuals. The 9    individual may use the title "behavior analyst" but may 10    not represent oneself as a licensed behavior analyst or 11    licensed assistant behavior analyst unless the individual 12    holds a license issued by the State.13        (6) An individual who is a matriculated student at a 14    nationally accredited university approved in rules or a 15    postdoctoral fellow from performing activities that are 16    considered to be the practice of applied behavior analysis 17    under this Act if the activities are part of a defined 18    program of study, course, practicum, internship, or 19    postdoctoral fellowship, provided that the applied 20    behavior analysis activities are directly supervised by a 21    licensed behavior analyst under this Act or a licensed 22    clinical psychologist.23        (7) An individual who is not licensed under this Act 24    from pursuing field experience in the practice of behavior 25    analysis if the experience is supervised by a licensed 26    behavior analyst or a licensed psychologist.  SB3807- 4 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1        (8) An individual with a learning behavior specialist 2    or school support personnel endorsement from the State 3    Board of Education, the school district in which the 4    school is located, or a special education joint agreement 5    serving the school district in which the school is located 6    from delivering behavior analytic services in a school 7    setting when employed by that school as long as those 8    services are defined in the scope of practice for that 9    endorsement and that person is not in any manner held out 10    to the public as a licensed behavior analyst or licensed 11    assistant behavior analyst.12        (9) A qualified intellectual disabilities 13    professional, meeting the minimum federal education 14    requirements outlined in 42 CFR 483.430, who is performing 15    the duties required for individuals with intellectual or 16    developmental disabilities in programs and facilities 17    regulated by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 18    Services, the Department of Human Services, or the 19    Department of Public Health, so long as the individual 20    does not use the titles provided in subsection (b).21        (10) A service provider, designated by the Department 22    of Human Services, from providing behavior intervention 23    and treatment, so long as the individual does not use the 24    titles provided in subsection (b).25    (d) This Act does not apply to an individual who, on the 26effective date of this Act, is engaging in the practice of   SB3807- 5 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1applied behavior analysis under the medical assistance program 2under the Illinois Public Aid Code while that individual is 3seeking the education, training, and experience necessary to 4obtain a license under this Act. 5    (e) No licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant 6behavior analyst shall engage in the practice of 7speech-language pathology or the practice of audiology, as 8defined in the Illinois Speech-Language Pathology and 9Audiology Practice Act, unless licensed to do so under that 10Act.11(Source: P.A. 102-953, eff. 5-27-22; 103-857, eff. 8-9-24.) 12    (225 ILCS 6/60)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)14    Sec. 60. Grounds for disciplinary action. 15    (a) The Department may refuse to issue or renew a license, 16or may suspend, revoke, place on probation, reprimand, or take 17any other disciplinary or nondisciplinary action deemed 18appropriate by the Department, including the imposition of 19fines not to exceed $10,000 for each violation, with regard to 20any license issued under the provisions of this Act for any one 21or a combination of the following grounds:22        (1) material misstatements in furnishing information 23    to the Department or to any other State agency or in 24    furnishing information to any insurance company with 25    respect to a claim on behalf of a licensee or a client;  SB3807- 6 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1        (2) violations or negligent or intentional disregard 2    of this Act or its rules;3        (3) conviction of or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo 4    contendere, finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of 5    judgment or sentencing, including, but not limited to, 6    convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, 7    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 8    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States that is 9    (i) a felony or (ii) a misdemeanor, an essential element 10    of which is dishonesty, or that is directly related to the 11    practice of behavior analysis;12        (4) fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or 13    procuring a license under this Act or in connection with 14    applying for renewal or restoration of a license under 15    this Act;16        (5) professional incompetence;17        (6) gross negligence in practice under this Act;18        (7) aiding or assisting another person in violating 19    any provision of this Act or its rules;20        (8) failing to provide information within 60 days in 21    response to a written request made by the Department;22        (9) engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 23    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 24    defraud, or harm the public as defined by the rules of the 25    Department or violating the rules of professional conduct 26    adopted by the Department;  SB3807- 7 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1        (10) habitual or excessive use or abuse of drugs 2    defined in law as controlled substances, of alcohol, or of 3    any other substances that results in the inability to 4    practice with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety;5        (11) adverse action taken by another state or 6    jurisdiction if at least one of the grounds for the 7    discipline is the same or substantially equivalent to 8    those set forth in this Section;9        (12) directly or indirectly giving to or receiving 10    from any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or 11    association any fee, commission, rebate, or other form of 12    compensation for any professional service not actually 13    rendered; nothing in this paragraph affects any bona fide 14    independent contractor or employment arrangements among 15    health care professionals, health facilities, health care 16    providers, or other entities, except as otherwise 17    prohibited by law; any employment arrangements may include 18    provisions for compensation, health insurance, pension, or 19    other employment benefits for the provision of services 20    within the scope of the licensee's practice under this 21    Act; nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 22    require an employment arrangement to receive professional 23    fees for services rendered;24        (13) a finding by the Department that the licensee, 25    after having the license placed on probationary status, 26    has violated the terms of probation or failed to comply   SB3807- 8 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    with those terms;2        (14) abandonment, without cause, of a client;3        (15) willfully making or filing false records or 4    reports relating to a licensee's practice, including, but 5    not limited to, false records filed with federal or State 6    agencies or departments;7        (16) willfully failing to report an instance of 8    suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Abused 9    and Neglected Child Reporting Act;10        (17) being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 11    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 12    under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, and 13    upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 14    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or 15    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 16    Child Reporting Act;17        (18) physical illness, mental illness, or any other 18    impairment or disability, including, but not limited to, 19    deterioration through the aging process, or loss of motor 20    skills that results in the inability to practice the 21    profession with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety;22        (19) solicitation of professional services by using 23    false or misleading advertising;24        (20) violation of the Health Care Worker Self-Referral 25    Act;26        (21) willfully failing to report an instance of   SB3807- 9 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    suspected abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or 2    self-neglect of an eligible adult as defined in and 3    required by the Adult Protective Services Act; or4        (22) being named as an abuser in a verified report by 5    the Department on Aging under the Adult Protective 6    Services Act, and upon proof by clear and convincing 7    evidence that the licensee abused, neglected, or 8    financially exploited an eligible adult as defined in the 9    Adult Protective Services Act.10    (b) The determination by a court that a licensee is 11subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 12provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 13Code shall result in an automatic suspension of the licensee's 14license. The suspension shall end upon a finding by a court 15that the licensee is no longer subject to involuntary 16admission or judicial admission and issues an order so finding 17and discharging the patient, and upon the recommendation of 18the Board to the Secretary that the licensee be allowed to 19resume professional practice.20    (c) The Department shall refuse to issue or renew or may 21suspend the license of a person who (i) fails to file a tax 22return, pay the tax, penalty, or interest shown in a filed tax 23return, or pay any final assessment of tax, penalty, or 24interest, as required by any tax Act administered by the 25Department of Revenue, until the requirements of the tax Act 26are satisfied or (ii) has failed to pay any court-ordered   SB3807- 10 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1child support as determined by a court order or by referral 2from the Department of Healthcare and Family Services.3    (c-1) The Department shall not revoke, suspend, place on 4probation, reprimand, refuse to issue or renew, or take any 5other disciplinary or non-disciplinary action against a 6person's authorization to practice under this Act based solely 7upon the person recommending, aiding, assisting, referring 8for, or participating in any health care service, so long as 9the care was not unlawful under the laws of this State, 10regardless of whether the client was a resident of this State 11or another state.12    (c-2) The Department shall not revoke, suspend, place on 13prohibition, reprimand, refuse to issue or renew, or take any 14other disciplinary or non-disciplinary action against a 15person's authorization to practice under this Act based upon 16the person's license, registration, or permit being revoked or 17suspended, or the person being otherwise disciplined, by any 18other state if that revocation, suspension, or other form of 19discipline was based solely on the person violating another 20state's laws prohibiting the provision of, authorization of, 21recommendation of, aiding or assisting in, referring for, or 22participation in any health care service if that health care 23service as provided would not have been unlawful under the 24laws of this State and is consistent with the applicable 25standard of conduct for a person practicing in Illinois under 26this Act.  SB3807- 11 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    (c-3) The conduct specified in subsections (c-1) and (c-2) 2shall not constitute grounds for suspension under Section 125.3    (c-4) The Department shall not revoke, suspend, summarily 4suspend, place on prohibition, reprimand, refuse to issue or 5renew, or take any other disciplinary or non-disciplinary 6action against a person's authorization to practice under this 7Act based solely upon the person's license, registration, or 8permit being revoked or suspended, or the person being 9otherwise disciplined, by any other state or territory other 10than Illinois for the referral for or having otherwise 11participated in any health care service, if the revocation, 12suspension, or disciplinary action was based solely on a 13violation of the other state's law prohibiting such health 14care services in the state, for a resident of the state, or in 15any other state. 16    (d) In enforcing this Section, the Department, upon a 17showing of a possible violation, may compel a person licensed 18to practice under this Act, or who has applied for licensure 19under this Act, to submit to a mental or physical examination, 20or both, which may include a substance abuse or sexual 21offender evaluation, as required by and at the expense of the 22Department.23        (1) The Department shall specifically designate the 24    examining physician licensed to practice medicine in all 25    of its branches or, if applicable, the multidisciplinary 26    team involved in providing the mental or physical   SB3807- 12 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    examination or both. The multidisciplinary team shall be 2    led by a physician licensed to practice medicine in all of 3    its branches and may consist of one or more or a 4    combination of physicians licensed to practice medicine in 5    all of its branches, licensed clinical psychologists, 6    licensed clinical professional counselors, and other 7    professional and administrative staff. Any examining 8    physician or member of the multidisciplinary team may 9    require any person ordered to submit to an examination 10    pursuant to this Section to submit to any additional 11    supplemental testing deemed necessary to complete any 12    examination or evaluation process, including, but not 13    limited to, blood testing, urinalysis, psychological 14    testing, or neuropsychological testing.15        (2) The Department may order the examining physician 16    or any member of the multidisciplinary team to present 17    testimony concerning this mental or physical examination 18    of the licensee or applicant. No information, report, 19    record, or other documents in any way related to the 20    examination shall be excluded by reason of any common law 21    or statutory privilege relating to communications between 22    the licensee or applicant and the examining physician or 23    any member of the multidisciplinary team. No authorization 24    is necessary from the licensee or applicant ordered to 25    undergo an examination for the examining physician or any 26    member of the multidisciplinary team to provide   SB3807- 13 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    information, reports, records, or other documents or to 2    provide any testimony regarding the examination and 3    evaluation.4        (3) The person to be examined may have, at the 5    person's own expense, another physician of the person's 6    choice present during all aspects of the examination. 7    However, that physician shall be present only to observe 8    and may not interfere in any way with the examination.9        (4) The failure of any person to submit to a mental or 10    physical examination without reasonable cause, when 11    ordered, shall result in an automatic suspension of the 12    person's license until the person submits to the 13    examination.14    (e) If the Department finds a person unable to practice 15because of the reasons set forth in this Section, the 16Department or Board may require that person to submit to care, 17counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated 18by the Department or Board, as a condition, term, or 19restriction for continued, reinstated, or renewed licensure to 20practice; or, in lieu of care, counseling, or treatment, the 21Department may file, or the Board may recommend to the 22Department to file, a complaint to immediately suspend, 23revoke, or otherwise discipline the license of the person. Any 24person whose license was granted, continued, reinstated, 25renewed, disciplined, or supervised subject to the terms, 26conditions, or restrictions, and who fails to comply with the   SB3807- 14 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1terms, conditions, or restrictions, shall be referred to the 2Secretary for a determination as to whether the person shall 3have the person's license suspended immediately, pending a 4hearing by the Department.5    (f) All fines imposed shall be paid within 60 days after 6the effective date of the order imposing the fine or in 7accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing the 8fine.9    If the Secretary immediately suspends a person's license 10under this subsection, a hearing on that person's license must 11be convened by the Department within 30 days after the 12suspension and completed without appreciable delay. The 13Department and Board shall have the authority to review the 14subject person's record of treatment and counseling regarding 15the impairment, to the extent permitted by applicable federal 16statutes and regulations safeguarding the confidentiality of 17medical records.18    A person licensed under this Act and affected under this 19Section shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the 20Department or Board that the person can resume practice in 21compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards under the 22provisions of the person's license.23    (g) The Department may adopt rules to implement, 24administer, and enforce this Section. 25(Source: P.A. 104-432, eff. 1-1-26.)   SB3807- 15 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    (225 ILCS 6/70)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)3    Sec. 70. Unlicensed practice; violation; civil penalty. 4    (a) Any person who practices, offers to practice, attempts 5to practice, or holds oneself out to practice as a licensed 6behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst 7without being licensed or exempt under this Act shall, in 8addition to any other penalty provided by law, pay a civil 9penalty to the Department in an amount not to exceed $10,000 10for each offense, as determined by the Department. The civil 11penalty shall be assessed by the Department after a hearing is 12held in accordance with the provisions set forth in this Act 13regarding the provision of a hearing for the discipline of a 14licensee.15    (a-5) Any member, partner, shareholder, director, officer, 16holder of any other ownership interest, or agent of a business 17organization that provides behavior analysis services who 18makes clinical decisions regarding patient care without being 19licensed or exempt under this Act shall be deemed to have 20violated this Section. 21    (b) The Department may investigate any actual, alleged, or 22suspected unlicensed activity. 23    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 24the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. 25The order shall constitute a final judgment and may be filed 26and execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment   SB3807- 16 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1from any court of record.2(Source: P.A. 102-953, eff. 5-27-22.) 3    (225 ILCS 6/150 rep.)4    Section 10. The Behavior Analyst Licensing Act is amended 5by repealing Section 150. 6    Section 15. The Professional Service Corporation Act is 7amended by changing Section 3.6 as follows: 8    (805 ILCS 10/3.6)  (from Ch. 32, par. 415-3.6)9    Sec. 3.6. "Related professions" and "related professional 10services" mean more than one personal service which requires 11as a condition precedent to the rendering thereof the 12obtaining of a license and which prior to October 1, 1973 could 13not be performed by a corporation by reason of law; provided, 14however, that these terms shall be restricted to:15        (1) a combination of 2 or more of the following 16    personal services: (a) "architecture" as defined in 17    Section 5 of the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 18    1989, (b) "professional engineering" as defined in Section 19    4 of the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, 20    (c) "structural engineering" as defined in Section 5 of 21    the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989, (d) "land 22    surveying" as defined in Section 2 of the Illinois 23    Professional Land Surveyor Act of 1989;  SB3807- 17 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1        (2) a combination of the following personal services: 2    (a) the practice of medicine by persons licensed under the 3    Medical Practice Act of 1987, (b) the practice of podiatry 4    as defined in the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987, 5    (c) the practice of dentistry as defined in the Illinois 6    Dental Practice Act, (d) the practice of optometry as 7    defined in the Illinois Optometric Practice Act of 1987;8        (3) a combination of 2 or more of the following 9    personal services: (a) the practice of clinical psychology 10    by persons licensed under the Clinical Psychologist 11    Licensing Act, (b) the practice of social work or clinical 12    social work by persons licensed under the Clinical Social 13    Work and Social Work Practice Act, (c) the practice of 14    marriage and family therapy by persons licensed under the 15    Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act, (d) the 16    practice of professional counseling or clinical 17    professional counseling by persons licensed under the 18    Professional Counselor and Clinical Professional Counselor 19    Licensing and Practice Act, or (e) the practice of sex 20    offender evaluations by persons licensed under the Sex 21    Offender Evaluation and Treatment Provider Act, or (f) the 22    practice of applied behavior analysis by persons licensed 23    under the Behavior Analyst Licensing Act; or24        (4) a combination of 2 or more of the following 25    personal services: (a) the practice of acupuncture by 26    persons licensed under the Acupuncture Practice Act, (b)   SB3807- 18 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    the practice of massage by persons licensed under the 2    Massage Therapy Practice Act, (c) the practice of 3    naprapathy by persons licensed under the Naprapathic 4    Practice Act, (d) the practice of occupational therapy by 5    persons licensed under the Illinois Occupational Therapy 6    Practice Act, (e) the practice of physical therapy by 7    persons licensed under the Illinois Physical Therapy Act, 8    or (f) the practice of speech-language therapy by persons 9    licensed under the Illinois Speech-Language Pathology and 10    Audiology Practice Act, or (g) the practice of applied 11    behavior analysis by persons licensed under the Behavior 12    Analyst Licensing Act. 13(Source: P.A. 101-95, eff. 7-19-19; 102-20, eff. 1-1-22.) 14    Section 20. The Professional Limited Liability Company Act 15is amended by changing Section 13 as follows: 16    (805 ILCS 185/13)17    Sec. 13. Nature of business.18    (a) A professional limited liability company may be formed 19to provide a professional service or services licensed by the 20Department except: 21        (1) the practice of dentistry unless all the members 22    and managers are licensed as dentists under the Illinois 23    Dental Practice Act; 24        (2) the practice of medicine unless all the managers,   SB3807- 19 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    if any, are licensed to practice medicine under the 2    Medical Practice Act of 1987 and each member is either: 3            (A) licensed to practice medicine under the 4        Medical Practice Act of 1987;5            (B) a registered medical corporation or 6        corporations organized pursuant to the Medical 7        Corporation Act;8            (C) a professional corporation organized pursuant 9        to the Professional Service Corporation Act of 10        physicians licensed to practice under the Medical 11        Practice Act of 1987;12            (D) a hospital or hospital affiliate as defined in 13        Section 10.8 of the Hospital Licensing Act; or14            (E) a professional limited liability company that 15        satisfies the requirements of subparagraph (A), (B), 16        (C), or (D); 17        (3) the practice of real estate unless all the members 18    and managers, if any, that actively participate in the 19    real estate activities of the professional limited 20    liability company are licensed to practice as a managing 21    broker or broker pursuant to the Real Estate License Act 22    of 2000. All nonparticipating members or managers shall 23    submit affidavits of nonparticipation as required by the 24    Department and the Real Estate License Act of 2000;25        (4) the practice of clinical psychology unless all the 26    managers and members are licensed to practice as a   SB3807- 20 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    clinical psychologist under the Clinical Psychologist 2    Licensing Act;3        (5) the practice of social work unless all the 4    managers and members are licensed to practice as a 5    clinical social worker or social worker under the Clinical 6    Social Work and Social Work Practice Act;7        (6) the practice of marriage and family therapy unless 8    all the managers and members are licensed to practice as a 9    marriage and family therapist under the Marriage and 10    Family Therapy Licensing Act;11        (7) the practice of professional counseling unless all 12    the managers and members are licensed to practice as a 13    clinical professional counselor or a professional 14    counselor under the Professional Counselor and Clinical 15    Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act;16        (8) the practice of sex offender evaluation and 17    treatment unless all the managers and members are licensed 18    to practice as a sex offender evaluator or sex offender 19    treatment provider under the Sex Offender Evaluation and 20    Treatment Provider Act; or21        (9) the practice of veterinary medicine unless all the 22    managers and members are licensed to practice as a 23    veterinarian under the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery 24    Practice Act of 2004. 25    (b) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section, any of 26the following professional services may be combined and   SB3807- 21 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1offered within a single professional limited liability company 2provided that each professional service is offered only by 3persons licensed to provide that professional service and all 4managers and members are licensed in at least one of the 5professional services offered by the professional limited 6liability company: 7        (1) the practice of medicine by physicians licensed 8    under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, the practice of 9    podiatry by podiatric physicians licensed under the 10    Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987, the practice of 11    dentistry by dentists licensed under the Illinois Dental 12    Practice Act, and the practice of optometry by 13    optometrists licensed under the Illinois Optometric 14    Practice Act of 1987; 15        (2) the practice of clinical psychology by clinical 16    psychologists licensed under the Clinical Psychologist 17    Licensing Act, the practice of social work by clinical 18    social workers or social workers licensed under the 19    Clinical Social Work and Social Work Practice Act, the 20    practice of marriage and family counseling by marriage and 21    family therapists licensed under the Marriage and Family 22    Therapy Licensing Act, the practice of professional 23    counseling by professional counselors and clinical 24    professional counselors licensed under the Professional 25    Counselor and Clinical Professional Counselor Licensing 26    and Practice Act, the practice of applied behavior   SB3807- 22 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    analysis by behavior analysts and assistant behavior 2    analysts licensed under the Behavior Analyst Licensing 3    Act, and the practice of sex offender evaluation and 4    treatment by sex offender evaluators and sex offender 5    treatment providers licensed under the Sex Offender 6    Evaluation and Treatment Provider Act;7        (3) the practice of architecture by persons licensed 8    under the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989, the 9    practice of professional engineering by persons licensed 10    under the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, 11    the practice of structural engineering by persons licensed 12    under the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989, and 13    the practice of land surveying by persons licensed under 14    the Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 1989; or15        (4) the practice of acupuncture by persons licensed 16    under the Acupuncture Practice Act, the practice of 17    massage by persons licensed under the Massage Licensing 18    Act, the practice of naprapathy by persons licensed under 19    the Naprapathic Practice Act, the practice of occupational 20    therapy by persons licensed under the Illinois 21    Occupational Therapy Practice Act, the practice of 22    physical therapy by persons licensed under the Illinois 23    Physical Therapy Act, and the practice of speech-language 24    pathology by persons licensed under the Illinois 25    Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Practice Act.26(Source: P.A. 102-970, eff. 5-27-22.)   SB3807- 23 -LRB104 17464 AAS 30890 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.